Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1315
Employees subject to sections; prohibited from political activities; when; disciplinary action.

State employees subject to sections 81-1301 to 81-1316 shall be prohibited from participation in political activities during office hours or while otherwise engaged in the performance of official duties as employees of this state. Any employee violating this section shall be subject to disciplinary action under the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to sections 81-1301 to 81-1328. Such disciplinary action may include demotion, dismissal, reduction of salary, or suspension.

Laws 1967, c. 573, § 15, p. 1896;

Laws 1987, LB 110, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 14.

Other prohibitions and requirements relating to political activities, see section 20-160.